

Trump signed Executive Order 13769, the "travel ban," on Friday, January 27th, 2017. The Executive Order suspended the U.S. Refugee Admissions Program for 120 days, suspended the admission of Syrian refugees indefinitely, and, most notably, blocked entry of all travel into the United States of non-citizens from Iran, Iraq, Libya, Somalia, Sudan, Syria, and Yemen (with minor exceptions) for 90 days. Trump signed the order to be effective immediately with little warning, notably without clear direction to officials and officers responsible for implementing the ban in the DHS, and without notifying lawyers who would be responsible for defending the ban in court at DOJ. The ban led to chaos, confusion, and legal challenges almost as soon as it was signed. On Monday, January 30th, Trump fired acting attorney general Sally Yates a few hours after she directed the DOJ not to defend the ban in court.




Four questions are important in this event:  why rush rollout? why chaos?  why fire yates? [TODO: write this part better]


The account of Trump and his administration is this:

[TODO: make clear that this is me summarizing what Trump has said]


[want to make clear here: these four questions are important, Trump has his own answers]

Many terror attacks in the U.S. have been carried about by people born in foreign countries, and the seven countries named in the Executive Order are sources of terror. The problem of terrorist attacks by the foreign-born is so dire that a 90-day ban entry of foreign nationals from the countries named in the Executive Order is needed until the U.S. can figure out how to vet these people for ties to terrorism or attitudes and beliefs conducive to terrorism. Although this may be unpleasant, it is necessary and urgent for national security:


https://www.c-span.org/video/?c4653208/president-trump-signs-travel-ban-executive-order
	Trump: I'm establishing new vetting measures to keep radical Islamic terrorists out of the United States of America. We don't want them here. We want to ensure we are not admitting into our country the very threats our soldiers are fighting overseas. We only want to admit those into our country who will support our country and love, deeply, our people.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/827865957750161408
	Donald J. Trump‏
	Feb 4

	Interesting that certain Middle-Eastern countries agree with the ban. They know if certain people are allowed in it's death & destruction!


https://www.whitehouse.gov/presidential-actions/executive-order-protecting-nation-foreign-terrorist-entry-united-states/
	Executive Order Protecting the Nation from Foreign Terrorist Entry into the United States

	...Numerous foreign-born individuals have been convicted or implicated in terrorism-related crimes since September 11, 2001, including foreign nationals who entered the United States after receiving visitor, student, or employment visas, or who entered through the United States refugee resettlement program. Deteriorating conditions in certain countries due to war, strife, disaster, and civil unrest increase the likelihood that terrorists will use any means possible to enter the United States. The United States must be vigilant during the visa-issuance process to ensure that those approved for admission do not intend to harm Americans and that they have no ties to terrorism.

	In order to protect Americans, the United States must ensure that those admitted to this country do not bear hostile attitudes toward it and its founding principles.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/825692045532618753
	Donald J. Trump
	Jan 29

	Our country needs strong borders and extreme vetting, NOW. Look what is happening all over Europe and, indeed, the world - a horrible mess!


https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	Feburary 7, 2017

	...Two States challenged the Executive Order as unconstitutional and violative of federal law, and a federal district court preliminarily ruled in their favor and temporarily enjoined enforcement of the Executive Order. The Government now moves for an emergency stay of the district court’s temporary restraining order while its appeal of that order proceeds.

	...the Government has argued that emergency relief is necessary to support its efforts to prevent terrorism


https://www.facebook.com/DonaldTrump/posts/10158567643610725
	Donald J. Trump
	January 29

	Statement Regarding Recent Executive Order Concerning Extreme Vetting

	...America is a proud nation of immigrants and we will continue to show compassion to those fleeing oppression, but we will do so while protecting our own citizens and border.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/826044059647107073
	Donald J. Trump
	Jan 30

	There is nothing nice about searching for terrorists before they can enter our country. This was a big part of my campaign. Study the world!


It is necessary to implement the ban without warning--otherwise, potential terrorist would realize the window to travel to the country is closing, and would rush in before the ban is enacted. Were this to happen, it would be a time of great peril for our country:


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	TRUMP: ...Now, what I wanted to do was do the exact same executive order, but said one thing. I said this to my people. Give them a one-month period of time. But Gen. Kelly, now Sec. Kelly, said if you do that, all these people will come in and (inaudible) the bad ones.

	You do agree there are bad people out there, right? That not everybody that's like you. You have some bad people out there.

	Kelly said you can't do that. And he was right. As soon as he said it I said wow, never thought of it. I said how about one week? He said no good. You got to do it immediately because if you do it immediately they don't have time to come in.

	Now nobody ever reports that. But that's why we did it quickly.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/826060143825666051
	Donald J. Trump‏
	Jan 30

	If the ban were announced with a one week notice, the "bad" would rush into our country during that week. A lot of bad "dudes" out there!


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/827996357252243456
	Donald J. Trump‏
	Feb 4

	Because the ban was lifted by a judge, many very bad and dangerous people may be pouring into our country. A terrible decision


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=a5mFBHJKfwE&t=8m15s
	And you know, this is a very dangerous period of time because while everybody is talking and dealing, a lot of bad people are thinking about, hey, let's go in right now.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/828342202174668800
	Donald J. Trump‏
	Feb 5

	Just cannot  believe a judge would put our country in such peril. If something happens blame him and court system. People pouring in. Bad!


Even with such short notice, the travel ban had an excellent rollout. There reports of chaos and confusion have some credibility, but this was caused by computer problems with Delta Airlines, the court decisions, protesters at the airports, and grand-standing by Chuck Schumer:


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	Feb 16 2017

	QUESTION: On the travel ban -- we could banter back and forth. On the travel ban would you accept that that was a good example of the smooth running of government...

	TRUMP: Yeah, I do. I do. Let me tell you about this government...

	QUESTION: Were there any mistakes...

	TRUMP: Wait. Wait. I know who you are. Just wait.

	Let me tell you about the travel ban. We had a very smooth rollout of the travel ban. But we had a bad court. Got a bad decision. We had a court that's been overturned. Again, may be wrong. But I think it's 80 percent of the time, a lot.

	We had a bad decision. We're going to keep going with that decision. We're going to put in a new executive order next week some time. But we had a bad decision.

	That's the other thing that was wrong with the travel ban. You had Delta with a massive problem with their computer system at the airports. You had some people that were put out there, brought by very nice busses, and they were put out at various locations.

	Despite that the only problem that we had is we had a bad court. We had a court that gave us what I consider to be, with great respect, a very bad decision. Very bad for the safety and security of our country. The rollout was perfect.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/826041397232943104

https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/826042483155013632
	Donald J. Trump
	Jan 30

	Only 109 people out of 325,000 were detained and held for questioning. Big problems at airports were caused by Delta computer outage, protesters and the tears of Senator Schumer. Secretary Kelly said that all is going well with very few problems. MAKE AMERICA SAFE AGAIN!


Acting Attorney General Sally Yates was fired for ordering the DOJ not to defend the travel ban. In doing this, she had jeopardized national security and betrayed the department of justice:


https://www.whitehouse.gov/briefings-statements/statement-appointment-dana-boente-acting-attorney-general/
	The acting Attorney General, Sally Yates, has betrayed the Department of Justice by refusing to enforce a legal order designed to protect the citizens of the United States. This order was approved as to form and legality by the Department of Justice Office of Legal Counsel.

	Ms. Yates is an Obama Administration appointee who is weak on borders and very weak on illegal immigration.

	It is time to get serious about protecting our country. Calling for tougher vetting for individuals travelling from seven dangerous places is not extreme. It is reasonable and necessary to protect our country.

	Tonight, President Trump relieved Ms. Yates of her duties



What actually happened:

...


Trump's travel ban, in it's various forms, had faced legal scrutiny since the start of his campaign. Trump initially called for a "complete shutdown of Muslims entering the United States," and defended this idea by saying there's something wrong with Islam and that "Islam hates us:"


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/06/11/what-president-trump-has-said-about-muslims-travel-ban/102565166/
	Dec. 7, 2015

	Trump speaking during a press conference:

	    "Donald J. Trump is calling for a total and complete shutdown of Muslims entering the United States until our country’s representatives can figure out what the hell is going on."

	Dec. 8, 2015

	Trump speaking on MSNBC:

	    "It’s not unconstitutional keeping people out, frankly, and until we get a hold of what’s going on. And then if you look at Franklin Roosevelt, a respected president, highly respected. Take a look at presidential proclamations back a long time ago ... what he was doing with Germans, Italians, and Japanese, because he had to do it. Because look, we are at war with radical Islam."


http://www.foxnews.com/transcript/2011/03/30/donald-trump-sits-down-bill-oreilly.html
	O'REILLY: ...Is there a Muslim problem in the world?

	TRUMP: Absolutely. Absolutely. I don't notice Swedish people knocking down the World Trade Center.

	...O'REILLY: But you do believe overall there is a Muslim problem in the world.

	TRUMP: Well, there is a Muslim problem. Absolutely. You just have to turn on your television set.

	O'REILLY: And do you think it encompasses all Muslims?

	TRUMP: No. And that's the sad part about life. Because you have fabulous Muslims. I know many Muslims and they're fabulous people. They're smart. They're industrious. They're great. Unfortunately, at this moment in time, there is a Muslim problem in the world. And by the way, and you know it and it I know it and some people don't like saying it because they think it's not politically correct.

	O'REILLY: …why don't they, the Muslim community throughout the world, speak out more forcefully against the jihadists?

	TRUMP: Well, there is something out there that brings a level of hostility that I have never seen in any religion. I mean, you can say what you want about the Koran. You can say what you want, but there's something there. There is tremendous hatred and tremendous hatred of us. I look at Iraq. I was watching the other day, you know, we have spent all this money and all those lives in Iraq. They hate us. They hate us. They can't get rid of us fast enough.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/06/11/what-president-trump-has-said-about-muslims-travel-ban/102565166/
	March 9, 2016

	Trump speaking on CNN:

	    "I think Islam hates us."


The "Muslim ban" proposal was highly controversial and led to immediate backlash from the press, officials, and legal experts, who pointed out that making a law that favors one religion over another is unconstitutional, and denying travel to U.S. residents would violate their due process rights:


http://www.msnbc.com/msnbc/trump-anti-muslim-proposal-probably-illegal
	Constitutional scholars: Trump’s anti-Muslim immigration proposal is probably illegal

	...“I believe Trump’s unprecedented proposal would violate our Constitution,” said Harvard Law Professor Laurence Tribe, “both the First Amendment’s Religion Clauses and the equality dimension of the Due Process Clause of the Fifth Amendment.” 


https://www.cnbc.com/2016/03/30/trumps-muslim-ban-unconstitutional-foreign-affairs-chairman.html
	Trump's Muslim ban unconstitutional: Foreign affairs chairman

	..."I think the thought we could have a religious test [for entrants] would be unconstitutional," said the California Republican, whose district includes parts of San Bernardino County, which suffered a deadly terrorist attack in December.


https://www.freep.com/story/news/politics/2016/06/18/donald-trump-muslim-immigration-ban/86038940/
	Depending how far a President Trump might take such a policy, however, there could be legal questions: If he tried, for instance, to keep permanent legal residents in the U.S. from re-entering while traveling abroad, they could invoke due process rights to challenge it.


https://www.nytimes.com/politics/first-draft/2015/12/07/donald-trump-calls-for-banning-muslims-from-entering-u-s/
	Should Congress enact such a law, he predicted, the Supreme Court would invalidate it as an overly restrictive immigration policy under the equal protection clause of the 14th Amendment.

	“It would certainly be challenged as unconstitutional,” he said. “And I predict the Supreme Court would strike it down.”


https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/2016-election/trump-defends-muslim-ban-common-sense-n476086
	Donald Trump Defends Muslim Ban as ‘Common Sense’


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/experts-trumps-muslim-entry-ban-idea-ridiculous-unconsitutional/2015/12/07/d44a970a-9d47-11e5-bce4-708fe33e3288_story.html
	Experts: Trump’s Muslim entry ban idea ‘ridiculous,’ ‘unconstitutional’ 

	Donald Trump’s proposal to bar all Muslims from entering the United States violates U.S. and international law and would never be allowed by the courts, legal scholars said late Monday.

	“Oh, for the love of God,” said Jonathan Turley, a constitutional law expert at George Washington University. 


In response to this backlash, Trump started making fewer statements about a ban on Muslims and instead starting saying he planned to ban travel from certain territories:


https://cases.justia.com/federal/district-courts/virginia/vaedce/1:2017cv00116/358386/111/0.pdf?ts=1487078541
	As the campaign proceeded, there were fewer references to an outright ban on Muslim immigration, with the focus switched to a ban on persons from territories that have a Muslim majority. Mr. Trump and then-vice-presidential candidate Mike Pence ("Pence") were asked about this evolution in an interview with Lesley Stahl ("Stahl") on July 17, 2016. The relevant portion reads:

		Stahl: [I]n December, you [i.e. Pence] tweeted, and I quote, "Calls to ban Muslims from entering the U.S are offensive and unconstitutional."

		Trump: So you call it territories. OK? We're gonna do territories. We're not gonna let people come in from Syria that nobody knows who they are.

		...

		Stahl: [S]o you're changing ... your position.

		Trump: --No, I--call it whatever you want. We'll call it territories, OK?

		Stahl: So not Muslims?

		Trump: You know--the Constitution--there's nothing like it. But it doesn't necessarily give us the right to commit suicide as a country, OK? And I'll tell you this. Call it whatever you want, change territories [sic], but there are territories and terror states and terror nations that we're not gonna allow the people to come into our country.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/06/11/what-president-trump-has-said-about-muslims-travel-ban/102565166/
	Oct. 9, 2016

	Trump speaking during the second presidential debate in St. Louis:

    	"The Muslim ban is something that in some form has morphed into a(n) extreme vetting from certain areas of the world."


    Dec. 22, 2016

	Trump when asked whether recent violence in Europe had affected his plans to ban Muslims:

    	"You know my plans. All along, I've been proven to be right. 100% correct. What's happening is disgraceful."


https://www.nbcnews.com/meet-the-press/meet-press-july-24-2016-n615706
	CHUCK TODD: The Muslim ban. I think you've pulled back from it, but you tell me.

	(BEGIN TAPE)

	DONALD TRUMP: We must immediately suspend immigration from any nation that has been compromised by terrorism until such time as proven vetting mechanisms have been put in place.

	(END TAPE)

	CHUCK TODD: This feels like a slight rollback--

	DONALD TRUMP: I don't think that's--

	CHUCK TODD: Should it be interpreted--

	DONALD TRUMP: I don't think so. I actually don't think it's a rollback. In fact, you could say it's an expansion. I'm looking now at territories. People were so upset when I used the word Muslim. Oh, you can't use the word Muslim. Remember this. And I'm okay with that, because I'm talking territory instead of Muslim.

	But just remember this: Our Constitution is great. But it doesn't necessarily give us the right to commit suicide, okay? Now, we have a religious, you know, everybody wants to be protected. And that's great. And that's the wonderful part of our Constitution. I view it differently.


Trump said his plans for a Muslim ban hadn't changed, but he's now framing it differently: instead of a ban on Muslims, it's a ban on travel from dangerous territories. [According](http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/316726-giuliani-trump-asked-me-how-to-do-a-muslim-ban-legally
) to Trump surrogate Rudy Giuliani, Trump arrived at this solution after asking his team "the right way" to do a Muslim ban "legally." In his public statements on this shift, Trump implied that he was aware of the constitutional problems with his ban, but believes national security is more important.

It is unclear if Trump understood the potential constitutional issues with his ban for violating due process rights of U.S. residents; nonetheless, he addressed the issue of whether or not the ban would apply to residents during his campaign. Trump again made shifting statements, first saying the ban will apply to American Muslims abroad, then clarifying it will not apply to U.S. citizens and residents:


http://thehill.com/blogs/ballot-box/presidential-races/262348-trump-calls-for-shutdown-of-muslims-entering-us
	Trump, in a formal statement from his campaign, urged a “total and complete shutdown” of all federal processes allowing followers of Islam into the country until elected leaders can “figure out what is going on.”

	Asked by The Hill whether that would include American Muslims currently abroad, Trump spokeswoman Hope Hicks replied over email: “Mr. Trump says, ‘everyone.’ ”

	During a Tuesday morning interview with ABC's "Good Morning America," however, Trump clarified that American Muslims would still be able to travel freely under his plan.

	"If a person is a Muslim and goes overseas and come back, they can come back. They are a citizen, that is different," Trump said. 


http://transcripts.cnn.com/TRANSCRIPTS/1512/07/cnnt.01.html
	LEMON: So, he did say all Muslims, right, entering, but he didn't clarify on Fox. He said that to The Hill but later clarified on Fox. Take a listen.

	(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP) 

	GRETA VAN SUSTEREN, FOX'S ON THE RECORD SHOW HOST: There are Americans serving in our military who are Muslims who are overseas on bases. Do you apply this rule to them?

	TRUMP: No. They would come home. They would be able to -- anybody here stays, but we have to be very vigilant. There are a lot of bad things going on. When you look at these polling numbers that came out, there is tremendous hatred, there is tremendous animosity.

	And that's -- this have taken of people living in our country, from Muslims living in our country, which is amazing. Because I have Muslim friends, Greta, and they're wonderful people. But there's a tremendous section and cross-section of Muslims living in our country who have tremendous animosity. We can't let this happen. We have a country to protect.

	SUSTEREN: Does it apply to your friends? This is apply to your Muslim friends, this...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: No. Of course...

	SUSTEREN: ... complete shutdown?

	TRUMP: ... this applies, this does not apply to people living in the country except that we have to be vigilant.


These two legal problems, whether or not the ban violated constitutional protections against religious discrimination and whether or not it violated constitutional protections of due process for U.S. residents, would later prove critical for the legal fight to keep the ban alive in courts. For the former, legal challenges focused on intent: was the ban, despite being religiously neutral on its face, meant to discriminate for or against a particular religion? For the latter, legal challenges were based on the impact the ban had on travelers: were travelers who were detained or prevented from boarding their flights given adequate notice and opportunity to respond?

On these points, things were by all accounts things were legally stacked against Trump's travel ban. As a district court would later point out, it is "well established" that courts can look at evidence beyond the face of a law to make judgements on it's constiutionality, and Trump's public statements during the campaign made it hard to argue the travel ban wasn't intended to be a Muslim ban:


https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	...It is well established that evidence of purpose beyond the face of the challenged law may be considered in evaluating Establishment and Equal Protection Clause claims. See, e.g., Church of the Lukumi Babalu Aye, Inc. v. City of Hialeah, 508 U.S. 520, 534 (1993) (“The Free Exercise Clause, like the Establishment Clause, extends beyond facial discrimination. . . . Official action that targets religious conduct for distinctive treatment cannot be shielded by mere compliance with the requirement of facial neutrality.”); Larson, 456 U.S. at 254-55 (holding that a facially neutral statute violated the Establishment Clause in light of legislative history demonstrating an intent to apply regulations only to minority religions); Village of Arlington Heights v. Metro. Housing Dev. Corp., 429 U.S. 252, 266-68 (1977) (explaining that circumstantial evidence of intent, including the historical background of the decision and statements by decisionmakers, may be considered in evaluating whether a governmental action was motivated by a discriminatory purpose).


The executive order as written applied to residents with a visa and lawful permanent residents ("green card" holders), and there is a clear legal precedent for protecting these persons due process rights. Immigration statutes and the Supreme Court make explicit that returning lawful permanent residents have due process rights:


https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	...The Fifth Amendment of the Constitution prohibits the Government from depriving individuals of their “life, liberty, or property, without due process of law.” U.S. Const. amend. V. The Government may not deprive a person of one of these protected interests without providing “notice and an opportunity to respond,” or, in other words, the opportunity to present reasons not to proceed with the deprivation and have them considered. United States v. Raya-Vaca, 771 F.3d 1195, 1204 (9th Cir. 2014); accordClevEmand Bd. of Educ. v. Loudermill, 470 U.S. 532, 542 (1985); ASSE Int’l, Inc. v. Kerry, 803 F.3d 1059, 1073 (9th Cir. 2015). 

	...due process requires [sic] notice and a hearing prior to restricting an individual’s ability to travel. ...See id.(“[T]he returning resident alien is entitled as a matter of due process to a hearing on the charges underlying any attempt to exclude him.” (quoting Rosenberg v. Fleuti, 374 U.S. 449, 460 (1963))).

	...The procedural protections provided by the Fifth Amendment’s Due Process Clause are not limited to citizens. Rather, they “appl[y] to all ‘persons’ within the United States, including aliens,” regardless of “whether their presence here is lawful, unlawful, temporary, or permanent.” Zadvydas v. Davis, 533 U.S. 678, 693 (2001). These rights also apply to certain aliens attempting to reenter the United States after travelling abroad. Landon v. Plasencia, 459 U.S. 21, 33-34 (1982).


http://www.scotusblog.com/2012/01/argument-preview-the-rights-of-lawful-permanent-residents-returning-to-the-u-s/
	The Supreme Court soon will again turn its gaze to a complex immigration case involving a long-term lawful permanent resident of the United States facing deportation.  Just last December, the Court in Judulang v. Holder rejected as arbitrary and capricious the ruling of the Board of Immigration Appeals that a lawful permanent resident convicted of a crime was not eligible for relief from deportation.  On January 18, in Vartelas v. Holder the Court will hear oral arguments in a removal case that raises an issue that has confounded the courts, namely, how the immigration laws and the U.S. Constitution apply to lawful permanent residents (i.e., legal immigrants) who leave the United States and then return.

	...The courts, including the Supreme Court, when addressing the case of a noncitizen who fails to fit neatly into the established legal categories, such as when a lawful permanent resident who has lived in the United States for many years — and thus has significant community ties – travels outside the country and seeks to return.  Given the ties that these lawful permanent residents generally have to the community, courts frequently have been reluctant to impose on them the stricter rules applicable to initial entrants.

	...In Rosenberg v. Fleuti (1963) a lawful permanent resident from Switzerland visited Mexico for a few hours and, upon his return, was charged with being excludable because he had committed a “crime involving moral turpitude” before he left the country; the U.S. government later claimed that he was also excludable because he was homosexual.  To avoid a harsh result, as well as to avoid deciding difficult constitutional questions, the Supreme Court interpreted the immigration statute to mean that Fleuti’s “innocent, casual, and brief” departure from the United States was not “meaningfully interruptive” of his lawful permanent residence and thus he was not seeking “entry” (and thus admission) into the country.  Under the Court’s reasoning, Fleuti therefore could not be denied admission on the exclusion grounds applicable to initial entrants.

	...In 1996, Congress added Section 101(a)(13)(C)(v) to the INA.  That statute provides that a lawful permanent resident who returns from a trip out of the United States “shall not be regarded as seeking an admission” unless he “has committed an offense identified in” Section 212(a)(2) of the INA, which includes crimes involving moral turpitude.  The change in the law helped lawful permanent residents without criminal convictions who traveled abroad because it did not treat them as seeking admission (and thus like initial entrants subject to the inadmissibility grounds).


Any lawful resident stranded, detained, or sent back due to the executive order would therefore have a strong case to challenge the ban on constitutional grounds.

This point would prove to be crucial for the survival of the ban in the courts. First, in the U.S., any law (such as Trump's executive order) cannot be challenged on constitutional grounds unless a plaintiff can demonstrate he or she has "standing"--that the plaintiff has or will suffer immediate, concrete harm traceable to the law:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Standing_(law)
	In law, standing or locus standi is the term for the ability of a party to demonstrate to the court sufficient connection to and harm from the law or action challenged to support that party's participation in the case.

	...In the United States, the current doctrine is that a person cannot bring a suit challenging the constitutionality of a law unless the plaintiff can demonstrate that he/she/it is or will "imminently" be harmed by the law. Otherwise, the court will rule that the plaintiff "lacks standing" to bring the suit, and will dismiss the case without considering the merits of the claim of unconstitutionality. To have a court declare a law unconstitutional, there must be a valid reason for the lawsuit. The party suing must have something to lose in order to sue unless it has automatic standing by action of law.


https://law.justia.com/constitution/us/article-3/20-substantial-interest-standing.html
	“The fundamental aspect of standing is that it focuses on the party seeking to get his complaint before a federal court and not on the issues he wishes to have adjudicated.” The “gist of the question of standing” is whether the party seeking relief has “alleged such a personal stake in the outcome of the controversy as to assure that concrete adverseness which sharpens the presentation of issues upon which the court so largely depends for illumination of difficult constitutional questions.”

	...the Court has been hesitant to assume jurisdiction over matters in which the plaintiff seeking relief cannot articulate a concrete harm. For example, in Laird v. Tatum, the Court held that plaintiffs challenging a domestic surveillance program lacked standing when their alleged injury stemmed from a “subjective chill,” as opposed to a “claim of specific present objective harm or a threat of specific future harm.” And in Spokeo, Inc. v. Robins, the Court explained that a concrete injury requires that an injury must “actually exist” or there must be a “risk of real harm,” such that a plaintiff who alleges nothing more than a bare procedural violation of a federal statute cannot satisfy the injury-in-fact requirement.


If even one traveler were inconvenienced in a way that violated their constitutional rights, the ban would eventually be struck down. For the Trump administration, arguing visa-holders don't have Constitutional rights would be a gamble, but trying the same for lawful permanent residents would be all but impossible. To ensure the ban's survival, the Trump administration would to make sure not even a single lawful permanent resident were barred from travel.

Second, if the ban could be shown to have caused irreparable harm to those affected, the courts would be able to quickly stop the enforcement of the ban, albeit temporarily, with a "Temporary Restraining Order" (TRO):


https://legal-dictionary.thefreedictionary.com/Temporary+Restraining+Order
	A Temporary Restraining Order (TRO) is a court order of limited duration. A TRO commands the parties in the case to maintain a certain status until the court can hear further evidence and decide whether to issue a preliminary injunction.

	Under federal and state rules of Civil Procedure, a person may obtain a TRO by visiting a judge or magistrate without notice to, or the presence of, the adverse party. A TRO may be issued by a court only if (1) it appears from specific facts shown in a signed, sworn Affidavit or complaint that immediate irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the applicant before the adverse party or the adverse party's attorney can be heard in opposition; and (2) the applicant's attorney describes to the court in writing the efforts, if any, that have been made to give notice to the adverse party and gives reasons to support the claim that notice should not be required.

	...The immediate potential for irreparable harm is the gravamen of the TRO. If an applicant is unable to prove that the harm suffered will be irreparable or that the irreparable harm is imminent, a court will not approve a TRO.


https://law.yale.edu/system/files/area/clinic/document/2017.01.28_emergency_motion_for_stay.pdf
	HAMEED KHALID DARWEESH, et al., Plaintiffs, - versus - DONALD TRUMP, et al., Defendants

	January 28, 2017

	TRANSCRIPT OF CIVIL CAUSE FOR EMERGENCY MOTIONFOR STAY OF REMOVAL BEFORE THE HONORABLE ANN M. DONNELLYUNITED STATES DISTRICT JUDGE

	...THE COURT: Well, I am going to stop you right there. So, I think everybody agrees that under Supreme Court precedent that considering the application, I am going to apply the traditional four-factor test. You agree with me on that, don't you?

	MS. WESTWATER: I am sorry, in which four-factor --

	THE COURT: The four-factor test that you apply for the traditional four-factor test for a temporary restraining order. So, I'll just go through them for you; likelihood of success on the merits, and really one of the most significant factors which is irreparable injury to the petitioner, the likelihood of injury to the opposing party, which is you, and where the public interest lies. And when the government is the opposing party, those two final factors, the likelihood of injury to the opposing party and the public interest merge. So, I'm just -- let's just go right to that irreparable injury to the petitioner. What is your argument that there won't be irreparable injury to either the petitioner or the members of the putative class?


For the travel ban, courts would have to decide whether or not to issue a TRO by weighing the public interest and injury suffered by travelers against the claims of injury suffered by the government (in this case, damage to national security) as well as the likeliness plaintiffs would win the case. If too many travelers suffered too great injury as a result of the ban, the courts could stop the ban for days or even weeks--ostensibly giving terrorists a window to enter the country and, by Trump's logic, seriously jeopardizing national security.

And claims of national security would not be enough for federal lawyers to succeed in court. Although Trump had argued publicly that national security supersedes consitutional concerns, courts "routinely" review and invalidate executive actions intended to promote national security, even in times of war: 


https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	Indeed, federal courts routinely review the constitutionality of—and even invalidate—actions taken by the executive to promote national security, and have done so even in times of conflict. See, e.g., Boumediene, 553 U.S. 723 (striking down a federal statute purporting to deprive federal courts of jurisdiction over habeas petitions filed by non-citizens being held as “enemy combatants” after being captured in Afghanistan or elsewhere and accused of authorizing, planning, committing, or aiding the terrorist attacks perpetrated on September 11, 2001); Aptheker v. Sec’y of State, 378 U.S. 500 (1964) (holding unconstitutional a statute denying passports to American members of the Communist Party despite national security concerns); Ex parte Endo, 323 U.S. 283 (1944) (holding unconstitutional the detention of a law-abiding and loyal American of Japanese ancestry during World War II and affirming federal court jurisdiction over habeas petitions by such individuals). 

	... “courts are not powerless to review the political branches’ actions” with respect to matters of national security. Alperin v. Vatican Bank, 410 F.3d 532, 559 n.17 (9th Cir. 2005). To the contrary, while counseling deference to the national security determinations of the political branches, the Supreme Court has made clear that the Government’s “authority and expertise in [such] matters do not automatically trump the Court’s own obligation to secure the protection that the Constitution grants to individuals,” even in times of war. Humanitarian Law Project, 561 U.S. at 34 (quoting id.at 61 (Breyer, J., dissenting)); see also United States v. Robel, 389 U.S. 258, 264 (1967) (“‘[N]ational defense’ cannot be deemed an end in itself, justifying any exercise of legislative power designed to promote such a goal. . . . It would indeed be ironic if, in the name of national defense, we would sanction the subversion of one of those liberties . . . which makes the defense of the Nation worthwhile.”)


The survival of the ban would therefore be directly tied to how much harm it would render to those it affected--if the extent of the damage was that a few tourists from the seven named countries only had a weeks notice to cancel their vacations, for example, the ban might have a chance: the injuries are reparable and only an inconvenience, and plaintiffs would have a tougher time arguing their due process rights were violated. If, on the other hand, the order lead to lawful U.S. residents being detained and stranded in dangerous countries without notice or an opportunity to appeal, the travel ban would be quickly invalidated and for all intents and purposes legally doomed.

By the time the ban was signed, Trump already had a tough legal fight ahead of him. It would be up to the administration to mitigate the impact of Trump's public statements about a "Muslim ban," ensure no travelers would suffer enough inconvenience or injury (in the legal sense) to challenge the legality of the ban, and toward that end ensure that the ban would not be applied to lawful residents. Succeeding in all of this would be, by Trump's logic, a critical matter of national security: should the ban fail to hold up in court--even temporarily--foreign terrorists would have advance warning of a closing window to enter the country.


...


[TODO: be more specific of what exactly ban did]

On January 27th, 2017, Trump signed Executive Order 13769, putting the travel ban into effect the moment it was signed. The immediate result has been described as "global chaos."

Because the ban was effective immediately, every person affected by the Executive Order who were currently in transit or about to travel to the United States were immediately considered barred from entry. The order canceled the visas of 60,000 - 100,000 foreign nationals who had until that moment allowed to travel to the United States. Of these, 1,200 visa-holders were denied boarding flights between January 27 and February 2. At least 109 travelers had already boarded and were subsequently detained at U.S. ports of entry, and a portion of these were sent back to their country they flew in from or attempted to be sent back. These last two groups in particular were caught by surprise by the ban: as one attorney put it in a January 28th hearing, "They took off before the executive order was signed. They landed after."


https://law.yale.edu/system/files/area/clinic/document/2017.01.28_emergency_motion_for_stay.pdf
	MR. GELERNT: -- they can't give assurances and we also just were told that the government is threatening to put someone back on a plane at 9:20 and we don't even know what's going on around the country. There are so many people -- and so we are here, what we think is a fairly modest request to the Court, to just keep things in place until both sides can brief it.

	...We think we have the better of it but certainly on irreparable harm ...They took off before the executive order was signed. They landed after. And so, they were in a horrible position. They were on U.S. soil and they certainly can't be sent back without, at a minimum, an asylum hearing and a Convention Against Torture -- I mean that is basic law.

	THE COURT: Do you have a sense of how many people we're talking about? that was another question that I had.

	MR. GELERNT: Yeah. You know, your Honor, we believe that it's upwards of a hundred to 200.


Travelers were not the only ones caught by surprise by the ban. According to the DHS Inspector General, leadership of Customs and Border Protection (CBP), primarily responsible for implementing the ban, had "virtually no warning" of the order's scope or that it was coming at all. According to then-Secretary of Homeland Security John Kelly, the Trump administration had kept the executive order on a "close hold basis" and so it was not distributed widely:


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LxKJ0FEoFqY&t=23m50s
	DHS Kelly: I did know it was under development. I had an opportunity to look at at least two--as I recollect--drafts as it got closer to Friday. Again I don't exactly know other than some of my legal shop representatives were involved, I would imagine some, on the landing team, I would imagine some of them. But the point is it came to the department it was you know on a close hold basis meaning we didn't distribute it to everyone in the department...


https://www.oig.dhs.gov/file/4678/download?token=kEDXANI_
	We found:

	* The leadership of CBP, the OHS entity primarily responsible for implementation of the order, had virtually no warning that the EO was to be issued or of the scope of the order, and was caught by surprise. Indeed, during the early period of implementation of the order, neither CBP nor the Department was sure of the answers to basic questions as to the scope of the order ...CBP was unable to issue definitive guidance in the early days of implementation of the EO, which contributed to significant delays at the ports of entry.


The DHS OIG's investigation into the travel ban found that CBP could not get answers on "basic questions" about the order from the Trump administration and so could not be sure how the order was to be implemented the first few days the ban was in effect.

The importance of this point should not be underestimated. There are questions about the ban's implementation who's answer would be crucial to it's survival in the courts: Should travelers in-transit at the time of the order be detained and sent back? What should be done to respect their due-process rights? Does the order apply to lawful permanent residents? And should U.S. residents be barred from returning home?

The answers to these questions, at least as interpreted on-the-fly by CBP and airlines, can be inferred from court documents and media reports:


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/30/politics/trump-travel-ban-q-and-a/
	This is the "extreme vetting" Trump promised during the campaign, but it still seems to have caught folks by surprise.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/01/28/trump-moves-past-day-refugee-ban-putin-more-executive-orders/97181992/
	...Judge grants emergency stay for those in limbo after immigration ban

	...Protests ramp up at airports across USA

	...Lawsuits also on the rise

	...Dozens detained at U.S. airports, other stranded abroad

	...Iran retaliates, Canada opens arms after Trump immigration ban

	...Trump: Immigration ban working 'nicely’

	...Refugee fallout around the USA

	...Advocacy group flooded with 1,000 calls amid 'complete chaos'

	...Iranian filmmaker Asghar Farhadi can't go to Oscars

	...Travel uncertainty for tens of thousands

	...Shockwaves felt through tech industry


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/30/politics/trump-travel-ban-q-and-a/
	...Homeland Security officials weren't given much guidance about how the order would be implemented or enforced. Thus the confusion and chaos.

	The ban snared green card holders and people with valid visas alike. Some travelers who were in the air when Trump signed the order weren't able to enter the country when they landed. Some were detained. Others were sent back to where they flew in from. Lawsuits began to fly and by Saturday night a federal judge had temporarily and partially blocked Trump's order.

	How big is the backlash?

	It's global. Hundreds showed up at airports across the country -- from New York to Atlanta to Dallas to Seattle -- to protest. Vocal crowds against the order gathered outside the White House. 

	...There's panic in some US colleges and universities that have a large number of foreign students. Some students and faculty members fear they'll have to decide between careers or families. Some raced back to the United States as the executive order loomed, so they would be able to complete a degree. Now they're left to wonder when they'll get to see their families again if they remain in the United States.

	...There's hardship for those who planned to come to the States as well. Mahmoud Hassan, an 18-year-old Syrian in Damascus, accepted an offer to attend MIT earlier this year, but because of the ban, he said his "dreams are basically ruined."


https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-MA-0007-0004.pdf
	HAMEED KHALID DARWEESH, et al., Plaintiffs, - versus - DONALD TRUMP, et al., Defendants

	...MS. CHURCH: ...Your Honor, we do know of at least one junior at MIT who's been in contact with us who attempted to board a plane, I believe in London -- I've talked to a lot of people today, so I'm not totally positive about the location -- who was denied.

	...A representative of the Attorney General's Office has told us that there are families currently in Egypt who all are lawful permanent residents who are all -- local Boston residents who were all sent back and not allowed to board a plane.

	...And those are my two examples. I'm tracking through national immigration lawyers thousands of examples. I mean, it's happening all over the world


https://www.nbcphiladelphia.com/news/local/Assali-Family-Syria-Donald-Trump-Vote-Allentown-Immigration-Ban-Travel-Order-412238593.html
	Assali's two brothers, their wives and their two children initiated their immigration attempts in 2003 while living in Syria. In December 2016, they were approved to join Assali and her husband in Allentown after the couple bought and furnished a home for them.


https://whyy.org/articles/update-assali-family-reunited-with-syrian-relatives-at-jfk-after-trumps-order-deported-them/
	Before getting on a plane to the U.S., the two Damascus craftsmen and their wives sold their cars and other possessions in Syria to afford the plane tickets. In Allentown, a new home fixed up by their Pennsylvania relatives awaited them.


https://www.nbcphiladelphia.com/news/local/Assali-Family-Syria-Donald-Trump-Vote-Allentown-Immigration-Ban-Travel-Order-412238593.html
	But early Saturday morning, after they landed at Philadelphia International Airport, Assali's relatives were detained. They were then sent on an 18-hour flight back overseas.

	...Assali's relatives, who are all Orthodox Christians, had visas and proof of green cards. The six Syrians were told they had to go back on the next flight and return to the Middle East, according to Assali. The next day, White House Chief of Staff Reince Priebus announced that the order would not extend to green card holders.

	They went on an 18-hour flight back to Doha and are currently in Damascus, according to the Assali family. One of Assali's relatives has heart problems and was given oxygen.

	Tawfik Assali, the 21-year-old son of one of the deported Syrians, told NBC News he came to the United States three years ago and was waiting for his mother to join him.

	"I was one hour away from hugging her," he said. "Seeing her."


https://www.usnews.com/news/us/articles/2017-02-02/man-sent-back-to-iran-under-trump-travel-ban-returns-to-us
	Man sent back to Iran under Trump travel ban returns to US 

	...Vayeghan traveled to the U.S. to join his family in Los Angeles and see his son in Indiana for the first time in 12 years.

	But what was expected to be a happy reunion turned into a wrenching ordeal.

	Vayeghan's brother, sister-in-law and niece had gathered at the airport with flowers and signs, 15 minutes before the flight was scheduled to arrive. They watched family after family greet loved ones as hours passed and Vayeghan did not emerge.

	When they inquired with airport workers they were told a new immigration order had been issued and it could take several hours to process. At midnight, there was still no sign of him and an airport information desk was closed.

	"At that point we got really, really frightened," his niece, Marjan Vayghan, told The Associated Press. "Because as far as we were concerned, he had just vanished into thin air."



http://www.orlandosentinel.com/news/orange/os-iranian-flight-lands-mco-20170412-story.html
	Iranian deported under Trump travel ban lands again in Orlando

	On Jan. 28, the same day President Donald Trump signed an executive order banning immigration from seven majority-Muslim nations, Askar Sahebjam was on a plane bound for Orlando.

	When his plane touched down at OIA in January, Askar and his wife were taken into a room where they faced hours of questioning by customs, and the couple’s cellphones and social media accounts were reviewed, his attorneys said.

	As that happened, his daughter waited in the terminal for her parents, who never were released. She said she only spoke once to her father via speaker phone.


http://fortune.com/2017/01/29/trump-travel-ban-istanbul/
	One 32-year-old Syrian man, Nail Zain, told Reuters he arrived at the airport expecting to fly to Los Angeles, but officials prevented him from boarding, saying his visa was canceled.

	“My wife and my son are in the United States. My son has American nationality. And we have been waiting for this moment for two years. Finally when I got the chance, they prevented me as a Syrian passport holder from traveling,” Zain said.


https://www.npr.org/2017/05/22/528944683/seattle-mom-sues-trump-to-stop-travel-ban-and-bring-her-son-home
	When President Trump signed an executive order banning travelers from six majority-Muslim countries, a 24-year-old mom from suburban Seattle joined several states and immigrants' rights groups in suing to stop it.

	Juweiya Ali is fighting to bring her 7-year-old son to the U.S. from Somalia. Ali was born in Somalia but she grew up here, and became a U.S. citizen. In high school, she traveled to Somalia with her mother to reconnect with their culture. That's where she met her future husband, and they had a son.

	When we sat down at a community center in the Seattle suburbs, Juweiya Ali wore a headscarf and a long, modest dress. She pulled photos of her son out of her purse. He now lives with his grandmother, halfway around the world, in Somalia.

	"Isn't he just the cutest thing?," Ali cooed. "He looks a lot like his dad. He is just so sweet."

	Ali eventually returned to the U.S., hoping to bring her family with her. But that's been a long process. She submitted the last piece of paperwork on January 20 — the same day as President Trump's inauguration.

	"So it went from feeling like everything was getting close to being done to, it stopped," Ali said. "Like, what do you mean, it stopped? It was heartbreaking."

	...Ali's son is still waiting for an interview at a U.S. consulate, the last step before he gets a visa. Even though the ban is on hold, the Trump administration is issuing fewer visas. Ali says it's hard to explain all this to her son when they video chat.

	"I can hear that in his voice, and I can see that in his eyes, the confusion," Ali said. "But I just tell him, hey, it's gonna be alright. It's going to be fine. And that's all that I can really tell a 7-year-old."


https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-VA-0004-0002.pdf
	Petitioners are 50 to 60 Lawful Permanent Residents (“LPRs”) currently detained at Dulles Airport. Respondents have detained these individuals or otherwise barred them from exiting the airport or continuing their transit into the United States. Respondents have denied these individuals access to lawyers. Upon information and belief, respondents imminently intend to remove these individuals from the United States.


https://www.nbcbayarea.com/news/local/Yemeni-Family-Stranded-by-Travel-Ban-Makes-New-Home-in-El-Sobrante-413784673.html
	Through an interpreter, Almurisi explained that back home in Yemen, he had a master's degree and practiced oral surgery. But as that country's civil war intensified, he decided it was time to get his family out.

	"I needed to protect me and my family," he said.

	He sold everything he owned, spent months getting a green card, then got on a flight to the U.S. with his wife and five children.

	When they got about four hours away from Washington, D.C., Trump's executive order was signed and went into effect. When their plane landed, the Almurisi family was ordered back on a plane and out of the country.

	"I was begging them to leave us here because of the war in Yemen," he said.


https://law.yale.edu/system/files/area/clinic/document/2017.01.28_emergency_motion_for_stay.pdf
	MR. GELERNT: ...And just with respect to the different classes, I think your Honor has basically put her finger on it, that that may end up being different arguments on the merits but as to the question that you're getting at, a factual question, are they going to face irreparable harm, absolutely. I mean, they are facing real harm because they are going back to some of the most dangerous countries.


https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-immigration-iraq-minorities/trump-travel-ban-leaves-iraqs-persecuted-yazidis-in-limbo-idUSKBN15E1E9
	ERBIL, Iraq (Reuters) - Khudeeda Naif won refuge in the United States as a member of Iraq’s Yazidi minority, but what he fears more than religious persecution is retribution for his brother’s work as an interpreter for the U.S. army in Iraq.

	Naif is one of the many affected by the U.S. President Donald Trump’s decision on Friday to temporarily ban the entry of refugees and others from seven Muslim-majority countries.

	Naif was scheduled to leave Iraq this week with his wife and two children when the International Organization for Migration (IOM) told him the trip was off until further notice.

	The insurgents systematically killed, captured and enslaved thousands of Yazidis, whose beliefs combine elements of several ancient Middle Eastern religions and are regarded by Islamic State as devil-worshippers.

	...Naif said his brother was killed in a suicide bombing along with two Americans in 2008 when U.S. forces occupied the country from 2003 to 2011.

	Although Iraqis working for the Americans use a pseudonym, his brother’s identity -- and by extension that of his family -- was revealed when he was killed.

	“Eventually, we are going to get killed,” Naif said.

	Naif’s family obtained a refugee visa to join his four sisters, brother and mother in the United States after six months of interviews and medical tests.

	...“We hope that he (Trump) changes his mind and at least takes the people who worked with them (the Americans),” Naif said.

	“We protected them,” he said. “We never expected this.”  


[said religious minorities prioritized, why not this guy? right its because refugee susneded entirely for 120 days. shows serious injury to those affected by Travel ban]


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/local/breaking/ct-trump-travel-ban-chicago-lawsuit-met-20170131-story.html
	...Dr. Amer Al Homssi, 24, a resident of internal medicine at Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, has been stuck overseas since being stopped Sunday at the Dubai airport trying to board a flight back to Chicago, according to his lawsuit.

	...The plaintiff, who filed under the pseudonym John Doe, is an Iranian citizen and legal permanent resident of the U.S. who lives in Chicago with his wife and three children. According to the suit, the man was planning to return to Chicago early this month in time for the birth of his first grandchild, but when he tried to get a return flight Saturday, the ticketing agency "refused to issue a ticket for his travel to the United States due to the executive order."


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/local/breaking/ct-green-card-iranian-artist-met-20170130-story.html
	Haghighi, 37, is now stuck in Melbourne, Australia, after vacationing there during an inopportune time — the days after President Donald Trump signed an executive order banning refugees from entering the U.S. and freezing immigration from seven Muslim-majority countries, including Iran. Haghighi got her green card last year and is traveling with an Iranian passport.

	...It's unclear how many people residing in the U.S. are stranded abroad


https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-MA-0007-0004.pdf
	ARGHAVAN LOUHGHALAM AND MAZDAK POURABDOLLAH TOOTKABONI, Petitioners
	v.
	DONALD J. TRUMP, PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES, et al, Respondents

	...JUDGE BURROUGHS: ...Where are we here?

	MS. CHURCH: ...this case was filed by the emergency phone call to this court at 7:30 p.m. this afternoon while both of these individuals were still in custody

	...And on the grounds that the national restraining order in Virginia ... do not completely solve the dilemma of ... two particular clients that we intend to amend the complaint to add. And these are a lawful permanent resident who is Attorney Doyle's client who's scheduled to fly in tomorrow morning from Iran


http://www.latimes.com/politics/washington/la-na-trailguide-updates-unknown-number-of-u-s-permanent-1485627539-htmlstory.html
	Jan. 28, 2017, 10:18 a.m.
	
	Unknown number of U.S. permanent residents stuck overseas as a result of Trump's immigration ban 

	An undetermined number of longtime U.S. residents have been stranded overseas as a result of President Trump's executive order temporarily blocking visas from seven countries in the Middle East and North Africa.

	All visa holders from those seven countries are now barred entry to the U.S., including lawful permanent residents, also known as green card holders, people with U.S. work visas and other types of visas, according to a senior U.S. immigration official. The official spoke on condition of anonymity to discuss internal deliberations.

	Some of the affected countries, such as Yemen and Libya, have relatively few nationals who are U.S. permanent residents or visa holders. But a large number of Iranians have permanent residency in the U.S., as do smaller numbers from some of the other countries on the list, which includes Iraq, Syria, Somalia and Sudan.

	Trump's executive order, issued Friday, immediately affected longtime foreign residents of the U.S. who were overseas at the time the order was signed, as well as any high-skilled tech workers or other work-visa holders from those seven countries caught outside the U.S. as of Friday.

	Lawyers at the Department of Homeland Security are examining Trump's executive order and drafting instructions for border officials, the official said.

	Eventually, the administration may set up a way for some visa holders to apply for a waiver from the ban, but that is still being deliberated and will take time to set up, the official said.

	Lawyers at DHS are scrambling to understand the order and parse out what it means for procedures at airport checkpoints and ports of entry around the country.

	Most senior DHS officials were not aware of the coming changes before they were released Friday. Immigration and customs officers are struggling to figure out which incoming travelers to let in while at the same time keep up with the normal flow of travel, the senior US immigration official said. 



https://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2017/02/09/17-35105.pdf
	State of Washington; State of Minnesota, Plaintiffs-Appellees,
	v,
	Donald J. Trump, President of the United States

	...The impact of the Executive Order was immediate and widespread. It was reported that thousands of visas were immediately canceled, hundreds of travelers with such visas were prevented from boarding airplanes bound for the United States or denied entry on arrival, and some travelers were detained. 

	...the States have offered ample evidence that if the Executive Order were reinstated even temporarily, it would substantially injure the States and multiple “other parties interested in the proceeding.” Nken, 556 U.S. at 434 (quoting Hilton v. Braunskill, 481 U.S. 770, 776 (1987)). When the Executive Order was in effect, the States contend that the travel prohibitions harmed the States’ university employees and students, separated families, and stranded the States’ residents abroad. These are substantial injuries and even irreparable harms. See Melendres v. Arpaio, 695 F.3d 990, 1002 (9th Cir. 2012) (“It is well established that the deprivation of constitutional rights ‘unquestionably constitutes irreparable injury.’” (quoting Elrod v. Burns, 427 U.S. 347, 373 (1976))).


Within hours of its signing, any hopes that travelers would lack standing to challenge the already legally precarious travel ban were dashed. The ban cut short years of efforts of a U.S. citizen to bring home her six year old son and stranded a Chicago businessman visiting his ailing mother in Iran. A family escaping civil war in Syria sold their cars and possessions to get green cards and plane tickets to the U.S., only to be sent back upon arrival. The brother of a fallen U.S. army interpreter feared for his family's life but was left stranded in Iraq. Any of these individuals would be able to sue for irreparable harms solely due to the executive order. Since Trump's public statements had already given a large body of evidence that the executive order was intended to be his Muslim ban, all litigants would have to do after demonstrating irreparable harm is argue the order was motivated by religious animus in violation of the establishment clause of the 1st Amendment and the equal protection clause of the 5th Amendment.

We will never know if such arguments would have eventually struck down the ban in higher courts, as the executive order was withdrawn before they could rule on it. But, as mentioned above, courts would not need to rule on the ban's lawfulness to issue a temporary restraining order, which would halt the ban until courts had more time to proceed. For this, courts would only need to find that plaintiffs were suffering disproportionate harm and would be likely to prevail. Courts would be able to decide on a TRO quickly (in a matter of days or hours), and so this was the most immediate legal threat to the ban, and, by Trump's logic, national security.

The havoc caused by the ban created a sense of urgency that a TRO was needed: if plaintiffs were likely to win, attorneys would later argue, why should they remain detained in airports, stranded in dangerous countries, and separated from their loved ones until then? And why risk letting this happen to anyone else? By the first few hours of the ban, the essential factor that courts use to decide on issuing a TRO, "the balance of hardship and public interest", was already decidedly in plaintiffs' favor. The only factor left was plaintiff's likeliness to win.

Perhaps, Trump's statements on the ban's intent would have been enough to convince courts that stranded travelers would eventually bring down the ban in court. But the ways in which travelers were deported, detained, and barred from travel under the executive order brought forth legal problems with the ban beyond Trump's statements on its intent.

Most of these had to do with due process and equal protection under the law. A basic tenet of U.S. law is that the government may not restrict your liberty (for instance, lock you up in jail) without adequate notice (for instance, they can't kidnap you in the middle of the night for breaking a secret law) and opportunity to respond (for instance, they can't sentence you to prison without letting you make your case):


https://www.law.cornell.edu/wex/due_process
	The Constitution states only one command twice. The Fifth Amendment says to the federal government that no one shall be "deprived of life, liberty or property without due process of law." The Fourteenth Amendment, ratified in 1868, uses the same eleven words, called the Due Process Clause, to describe a legal obligation of all states. These words have as their central promise an assurance that all levels of American government must operate within the law ("legality") and provide fair procedures.

	...The clause also promises that before depriving a citizen of life, liberty or property, government must follow fair procedures. Thus, it is not always enough for the government just to act in accordance with whatever law there may happen to be. Citizens may also be entitled to have the government observe or offer fair procedures, whether or not those procedures have been provided for in the law on the basis of which it is acting. Action denying the process that is “due” would be unconstitutional. Suppose, for example, state law gives students a right to a public education, but doesn't say anything about discipline. Before the state could take that right away from a student, by expelling her for misbehavior, it would have to provide fair procedures, i.e. “due process.”


Throughout U.S. history, courts have ruled on what "liberty interests" are protected by due process, and Congress and courts have prescribed as to what processes of law must be available to protect these interests. Whatever the process actually is varies, but it must be "fair" (e.g. your hearing can't be scheduled 5 minutes after you're arrested while you're in jail, and the government can't deliberately pick your arch-nemesis to be the judge), with courts being able to review laws and executive actions to decide what's fair for each situation:


https://www.law.cornell.edu/wex/due_process
	...While there is no definitive list of the "required procedures" that due process requires, Judge Henry Friendly generated a list that remains highly influential, as to both content and relative priority:

    1. An unbiased tribunal.
	2. Notice of the proposed action and the grounds asserted for it.
	3. Opportunity to present reasons why the proposed action should not be taken.
	4. The right to present evidence, including the right to call witnesses.
	5. The right to know opposing evidence.
	6. The right to cross-examine adverse witnesses.
	7. A decision based exclusively on the evidence presented.
	8. Opportunity to be represented by counsel.
	9. Requirement that the tribunal prepare a record of the evidence presented.
	10. Requirement that the tribunal prepare written findings of fact and reasons for its decision.

    This is not a list of procedures which are required to prove due process, but rather a list of the kinds of procedures that might be claimed in a "due process" argument, roughly in order of their perceived importance.


To give one example, courts have generally held that family and child rearing are one of these liberty interests that cannot be infringed without due process (for example, child protective services can't take your kids away without giving you a fair opportunity to appeal in a hearing). But lawsuits would bring a strong case that Trump's travel ban did exactly that.

Ali v. Trump was on filed Jan 30, 2017 on behalf of U.S. residents and their family members stranded abroad due to the travel ban. The Ali case illustrated the problems with the ban and why due process is important.

One of the lead plaintiffs in the case, Ahmed Ali and his wife Initkhab, are two Americans raising a family in the small agricultural town of Las Banos, California. His second daughter, Eman, was born in Yemen after Initkhab and his first daughter had left to take care of their ailing grandmother. Ahmed, who had worked as the manager of a supermarket, had stayed behind in the U.S. to support his family.

As their grandmother's health improved, Ahmed worked to bring his family back home; by 2010, he had saved enough money for their return trip. But Ahmed and Initkhab were surprised by a legal technicality that would prevent them from bringing their daughter back: even though Initkhab was a U.S. citizen, since she had not physically resided in the U.S. for five years before her daughter was born, Eman had not been granted U.S. citizenship at birth. Ahmed paid the $420 filing fee to get his daughter a family-based immigrant visa.

Meanwhile, the situation in Yemen had began to deteriorate:


http://www.cnn.com/2013/08/05/world/yemen-us-drone-strike/index.html
	Drone strikes kill militants in Yemen; Americans urged to leave

	August 7, 2013

	...the State Department urged Americans in Yemen to leave immediately, citing terrorist activities and civil unrest. All non-emergency U.S. government personnel were also told to leave.

	Two U.S. military transport aircraft landed in Yemen on Tuesday to evacuate American citizens. 


By 2013, Eman's visa application had still not been approved. Initkhab and her eldest daughter fled to the U.S. while Eman went to live with Ahmed's parents in Yemen's capital, Sana'a. Ahmed and Initkhab hoped Eman's visa application would be finished soon.

Finally, on December 15, 2016, Ahmed got an email from the National Visa Center: Eman's immigrant visa interview was scheduled for January 22, 2017. Since the consular services in Yemen had shut down, Eman's interview would take place in Djibouti, across the Red Sea.

Meanwhile, the conflict in Yemen had intensified, along with its toll on those stuck in the country:


http://www.aljazeera.com/news/2017/12/timeline-war-famine-failed-talks-yemen-171204155426740.html
	...UN talks collapse

	...August 7, 2016: UN-sponsored talks to establish peace in Yemen collapsed and fighting resumed once more between Houthi rebels and pro-government forces.

	...August 30, 2016: ISIL claims bombing at an army training camp in Yemen's port city of Aden that killed at least 70 people. The UN announced that the death toll from the war in Yemen has risen to more than 10,000 people.

	...October 29, 2016: Three weeks into a cholera outbreak in the war-torn country, the WHO said at least 1,410 cases were detected.

	...November 29, 2016: Houthi rebels formed a new government in Sanaa, flouting the UN-brokered peace process.


http://www.aljazeera.com/news/2017/12/yemen-level-civil-war-171204162917355.html
	Yemen: 'Now there will be a new level of civil war'

	4 Dec 2017

	The death of Yemen's former president Ali Abdullah Saleh raises doubts about the future of the war-torn country, as a Saudi-led coalition's fight against Houthi rebels will likely intensify, analysts say.


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-middle-east-38767874
	Yemen: Food crisis could become famine this year, UN warns

    27 January 2017


https://civiliansinconflict.org/publications/research/civilian-perspectives-on-conflict-yemen/
	What remains constant across the territory is the inability for civilians to get any recourse from any of the armed actors. A 46-year-old man from Majzer, Mareb said, “We would meet with [the] party that caused us harm and they would apologize, but blame the other side for what happened. I don’t trust anyone. All sides are criminals and they have no conscience whatsoever.” When asked what civilians did to protect themselves during the conflict, many civilians said they left their homes. “We just ran from one neighborhood to another. It’s all we could do,” said a 43-year-old woman from Aden. In Sana’a, civilians said that they either moved to safer areas or stayed in ground floor away from windows, especially when they heard coalition fighter jets. “We could only flee from one place to another. There is no safe place,” said a 55-year-old man

	From the beginning of the conflict, Houthi-Saleh forces have engaged in shelling of civilian residential areas, medical facilities, schools, and other civilian infrastructure, causing many civilians in Taiz and Aden to flee. Civilians in both cities reported deliberate sniper attacks against civilians, accusing the Houthi-Saleh forces of engaging in this practice.

	On the other side, Saudi-led coalition strikes caused deaths, injuries, and the destruction of schools, medical facilities, and businesses in governorates in which CIVIC conducted research, echoing findings of other international and Yemeni organizations. According to the United Nations, the coalition is responsible for 60 percent of the civilian casualties since it intervened in March 2015. Civilians living in Sana’a, like their fellow citizens in Aden and Taiz, concluded that they were deliberately targeted.


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/08/19/world/middleeast/yemen-doctors-without-borders-hospitals.html
	Aug 18, 2016

	SANA, Yemen — Doctors Without Borders announced on Thursday that it would evacuate its staff from six hospitals in northern Yemen because it could not get assurances that its hospitals would not be bombed again.


https://www.humanitarianresponse.info/en/operations/yemen/document/yemen-cholera-outbreak-situation-report-15-january-2017
	Yemen: Cholera Outbreak - Situation Report as of 15 January 2017

	* As of 11 January 2017, 15,658 suspected cholera cases have been reported in 156 districts.

	* A total of 180 out of 841 cases have tested positive for Vibrio Cholera, serotype Ogawa.

	* Overall, the epidemic curve shows a declining trend from week 51 onwards, while the attack rate remains high in some high risk districts.


Ahmed made arrangements for Eman's trip from to Djibouti. Eman, then 12 years old, would travel from Sana'a south to Aden, on Yemen's coast. From there she would take a plane to Jordan and meet her father, who would fly with her to Djibouti. There, Ahmed had secured himself and his daughter a stay in a hotel and 14-day Djibouti visas--enough time for Eman to get her required medical examination and complete her interview. Then, if the interview were a success, Ahmed and Eman could travel from Djibouti to the United States, whereupon Eman would immediately become a lawful permanent resident.

The route from Sana'a to Aden was dangerous: it crossed the line dividing Houthi and Hadi controlled territory, where fighting had intensified, and smugglers had been kidnapping and torturing migrants:


https://www.nrc.no/news/2017/august/yemen-airport-closure-killed-more-people-than-airstrikes/
	Yemen airport closure killed more people than airstrikes
	Published 09. Aug 2017

	...Prior to the escalation of conflict in Yemen, an estimated 7,000 Yemenis were travelling abroad from Sana’a International Airport for medical treatment not available within the country, a number that grew exponentially following the escalation of violence in early 2015.

	“Denial of access to travel has condemned thousands of Yemenis with survivable illnesses to death,” said Mutasim Hamdan, the Norwegian Refugee Council’s Country Director in Yemen. “Beyond airstrikes and cholera, the war in Yemen is devastating Yemeni lives on all fronts.”

	...Mohammed’s father was among thousands of Yemenis with an urgent need for medical treatment outside the country. “The only way to save my father’s life was to take him abroad, the treatment needed was not available in Yemen.” Mohammed travelled with his father for 24 hours by road to Seiyun Airport, in Yemen’s south.

	“The doctors said that it was dangerous for him to travel all the way there, that he might die on the way, but it was our only option. We had to pass through many checkpoints. But the journey was too much for my father.” Mohammed’s father died less than a day before his flight.

	Since the escalation of conflict in Yemen in March 2015, violent attacks have resulted in more than 54,000 casualties, and devastated existing infrastructure.


http://www.middleeasteye.net/news/i-do-not-want-be-sniper-how-yemen-shopkeeper-took-arms-1728544015
	Before war came to Yemen, 'Ahmed' was a shopkeeper. Now he's a sniper, armed with a Kalashnikov, earning $8 a day

	Wednesday 25 January 2017

	...Living in a snipers' zone

	The Houthis, who also have their own snipers, have laid siege to Taiz city with snipers and landmines, shooting anyone who tries to enter from the main roads.

	Snipers from both sides accompany fighters on the battlefield - but in Taiz, the conflict zones are in the city, which is full of resident civilians. Both sides say they only target enemy fighters - but civilians are often caught up in the conflict.

	...Mohammed's brother, Tallal, told MEE: "Mohammed wanted to get to the hospital as soon as possible to see his uncle. But he arrived himself, as a dead body, because of the odious snipers.

	“We have not left the city because of the danger of snipers - not because of clashes or missiles. Snipers are a hidden danger in the city.”


http://www.foxnews.com/world/2017/01/28/amid-yemen-chaos-migrants-stream-in-only-to-face-torment.html
	Published January 28, 2017

	ADEN, Yemen –  After reaching Yemen's shores in a packed migrant boat, the young Ethiopian coffee farmer was plunged into a living hell. The smugglers wanted thousands of dollars in ransom from the migrants, and they used him as an example of what would happen if they didn't pay.

	Each day for a month, they inflicted new tortures on him, Omar Farrag told The Associated Press. They put him in a tank of water and lit a fire underneath it. They wrapped his limbs with tight barbed wire. At times, they heated the barbed wire.

	Finally, his younger brother came from Ethiopia with $2,000 in ransom money. The smugglers decided they could squeeze more money out of him too, so they tortured his brother and ended up killing him, Farrag said.

	...The chaos caused by the civil war has raised migrants' hopes that they can slip through to Saudi Arabia, with no central authority keeping watch. However, the turmoil has also left migrants vulnerable to abuse and cruelty at the hands of the armed trafficking rings, many believed connected to and acting with protection from the multiple militias involved in the war.

	After taking migrants' money as payment to transport them, the traffickers often demand more, sometimes even phoning their families in Ethiopia so they can hear the torment their loved ones are subjected to. Rape is so widespread that women carry contraception for fear of becoming pregnant.

	...De Boeck, the IOM chief in Sanaa, said that trafficking in human organs is also on the rise.

	"The trafficking of people for organs ... seems to be more widespread, related to the fact that there is a collapse of the state and no capacity to have the rule of law applied," he said.

	Farrag, the coffee farmer, bears marks of torture at the hands of the smugglers. His arms are covered with burns and scars and he has a deep scar under one eye. One of his toes is missing.

	"Now, if I see a migrant with a scar, I can tell how he sustained it. I have tasted all sorts of torture," he said, looking around nervously as he spoke.

	He refused to be photographed or filmed, saying he didn't want his family to find out he was alive.


Accompanied by her uncle, Eman made it safely from Sana'a to Aden, and met her father in Jordan. In Djibouti, her interview had been a success, and Ahmed learned that Eman had been approved to enter the United States as a lawful permanent resident on January 25, 2017. After problems scheduling a flight that stopped in Canada, Ahmed and Eman were ready to board a final flight home on January 28, 2017.

But the final trip home was not to be: while Ahmed and Eman were getting ready to board their flight, Ahmed was told by airline officials that his daughter was not permitted to board the flight due to President Trump's executive order, signed the day before. Ahmed's attorney sent a letter to the U.S. Embassy in Djibouti requesting Eman be granted a "national interest" waiver under the EO, but to no avail: On Jan 30, a consular officer told Ahmed's lawyer the embassy did not have guidance yet on how waivers to the executive order would be reviewed or issued.

Ahmed could not leave his daughter alone and would not send her back on the dangerous journey to Sana'a. Meanwhile, famine, disease, and fighting in Yemen had only been getting worse, Ahmed and Eman's Djibouti visas were running out, and Ahmed, who had taken an extended leave from work to meet his daughter, was spending $115 a night from his family's savings to stay at the hotel. Ahmed and Eman were left stuck with no way to appeal their case but the courts.

Ahmed and Eman's case is exemplary of why the government should not be allowed to constrain your liberty without fair processes of law: had Ahmed been notified of the ban, Eman would have been saved a dangerous trip through Yemen; had Ahmed and Eman been given a fair chance to appeal, they might not have been stuck in a precarious situation. The Trump administration would later acknowledge these due process problems with the executive order: in a legal defense of a second attempt at the travel ban a month later, the administration argued that the second order, in contrast to the first, would satisfy "due process requirements" like Ahmed's with a "robust waiver provision:"


https://www.ca9.uscourts.gov/media/view_video.php?pk_vid=0000010885
	Judge Clifton: “If the order said Muslims cannot be admitted, would anybody have standing to challenge that?”

	August E. Flentji, Special Counsel: “I think *Mandel* and *Din* give a route to make a constitutional challenge that if there were such an order. It would be by U.S. citizen with a connection to someone seeking entry”


https://www.nbcnews.com/news/us-news/trump-administration-previews-defense-new-travel-order-n730826
	Trump Administration Previews Defense of New Travel Order
	
	...The new executive order contains "a roust waiver provision," allowing exceptions to the 90-day ban on travel from six countries. "That case-by-case process plainly satisfies any possible due process requirements," the administration argued, when a U.S. citizen, company, or university seeks the entry of someone overseas.

	...The government says the new order gives examples of when a waiver could be appropriate, including when a foreign national "seeks to enter the United States to visit a close family member."


Ali v. Trump, however, went farther than that: because the executive order was intended to be a Muslim ban, it didn't matter how much the government attempted or did not attempt to provide fair due process (consider that if the government tried to pass a law banning Muslims from voting, it wouldn't matter so much whether or not the law provided for an attempt to appeal). It is hard to argue a 12 year old girl is a danger to national security, but easy to argue the ban was intended to discriminate against Muslims from Trump's public statements. The ban was an arbitrary government action that infringed on plaintiff's fundamental rights out of discriminatory animus, violating the equal protection clause of the 14th Ammendment; this, plaintiffs would argue, meant Ali's case and others like them should be subject to the strictest judicial review, which put the burden on the justice department to prove the ban was constitutional.

[TODO: put in Mohhamed v. Trump? argued procedural, substantitive due process for basically same case, multiple plaintiffs, TRO in hours. here or next section]

Courts would later find, however, that the strongest Constitutional argument against the ban rested on how it applied to lawful permanent U.S. residents (LPRs), so-called "green card" holders. Courts have long held that all people residing in the United States have Constitutional rights, including lawful permanent residents. In particular, case law and statutes make it explicit that LPRs have the right to travel in and out of the United States, so long as they have not committed any crimes and it is clear that they intend to live in the U.S. permanently:


http://digitalcommons.law.yale.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1418&context=ylpr
	The saga of the immigrant's constitutional odyssey began in 1886 with the historic decision of Yick Wo v. Hopkins. In that case, the Supreme Court invalidated a San Francisco ordinance which resulted in 200 Chinese laundries being closed while 80 other laundries remained open, all operated by non-Chinese. Finding that hostility to the race and nationality of petitioners could not be constitutionally tolerated, the Court applied the Equal Protection Clause to hold that their "rights ... are not less, because they are aliens and subjects of the Emperor of China." Therefore, because the protections of the Fourteenth Amendment were universal in their application to "all persons within the territorial jurisdiction" of this country, the Court established that aliens were within the arms of the Constitution.


https://www.appleseednetwork.org/wp-content/uploads/2017/03/Nixon-Peabody-%E2%80%93-Memo-on-LPRs-February-2017.pdf
	A LPR who remains physically present in the United States is protected by the Fifth Amendment, which affords procedural protections for persons accused of crimes and provides for due process of law before a person is deprived of life, liberty, or property. Kwong Hai Chew v. Colding, 344 U.S. 590, 597 (1953); Wong Wing v. United States, 163 U.S. 228, 238 (1896) (all persons within the territory of the United States are entitled to Fifth and Sixth Amendment protection); Zadvydas v. Davis, 533 U.S. 678, 693 (2001) (when a person enters the United States, "the legal circumstance changes, for the Due Process Clause applies to all 'persons' within the United States, including aliens, whether their presence here is lawful, unlawful, temporary, or permanent"). A LPR returning from abroad is entitled to a due process hearing on any charges that would attempt to exclude the LPR from the United States. Rosenberg v. Fleuti, 374 U.S. 449, 460 (1963); Landon v. Plasencia, 459 U.S. 21, 33 (1982).

	...The Due Process Clause also protects the right to travel internationally, which cannot be denied without providing due process. Califano v. Aznavorian, 439 U.S. 170, 176 (1978); Abdelfattah, 787 F.3d at 539. However, the right to international travel is subject to further regulatory restrictions than the right to travel interstate, which is a "virtually unqualified" right. Edwards v. California, 314 U.S. 160 (1941); Califano v. Aznavorian, 439 U.S. 170, 176 (1978).

	Constitutional rights have also been extended to foreign nationals who have traveled abroad. In Ibrahim v. Department of Homeland Security, 669 F.3d 983, 996 (9 th Cir. 2012), a Malaysian citizen pursuing a PhD degree at Stanford University attended a conference abroad and was subsequently denied entry to the U.S. because her name was on a government "no-fly" list. Finding the relevant inquiry to be "whether the alien has voluntarily established a connection to the United States," the Court held that Ibrahim could invoke her Fifth Amendment rights in light of her connections to the U.S. (she had been studying in the U.S. for five years), and her purpose of travel (presenting her research at a conference), which served "to further, not to sever, her connections to the United States." Id. at 997 (following the "significant voluntary connection" test of Verdugo-Urquidez).


[TODO: explain court case like Flueti and why it makes no sense to treat resident returning from excursion as if they were seeking admission]


Accordingly, courts have recognized the right to travel as one of the liberties that the government cannot deprive you of without due process:


https://www.law.cornell.edu/supremecourt/text/357/116
	...The right to travel is a part of the "liberty" of which the citizen cannot be deprived without due process of law under the Fifth Amendment. So much is conceded by the Solicitor General. In Anglo-Saxon law, that right was emerging at least as early as the Magna Carta.

	Three Human Rights in the Constitution of 1787 (1956), 171-181, 187 et seq., shows how deeply engrained in our history this freedom of movement is. Freedom of movement across frontiers in either direction, and inside frontiers as well, was a part of our heritage. Travel abroad, like travel within the country, may be necessary for a livelihood. It may be as close to the heart of the individual as the choice of what he eats, or wears, or reads. Freedom of movement is basic in our scheme of values. See Crandall v. Nevada, 6 Wall. 35, 44; Williams v. Fears, 179 U.S. 270, 274; Edwards v. California, 314 U.S. 160. "Our nation," wrote Chafee, has thrived on the principle that, outside areas of plainly harmful conduct, every American is left to shape his own life as he thinks best, do what he pleases, go where he pleases.


This does not mean that the Federal Government cannot restrict U.S. residents' travel to certain countries. President Kennedy banned U.S. citizens from traveling to Cuba during the missile crisis, for example, and the Federal government reserves the right to ban travel even to certain parts of the U.S. in the event of quarantine; rather, the Constitution bars the government from restricting U.S. residents' right to travel without sufficient justification, notice, and opportunity to respond.

But the executive order, on its face, did exactly that: the order did not bar travel from the seven named countries, but rather barred entry into the United States of citizens of these countries, regardless of where they were traveling from, whether or not they were dual citizens, or whether or not they were lawful U.S. residents.

Were the order followed as written, any U.S. resident with citizenship in these countries would not be able to return home were they to leave the United States. This fact alone was enough to interfere with the lives of U.S. residents; in one case, a surgeon and Michigan resident with a Sudanese passport and a pending U.S. citizenship nearly canceled his surgery appointments as he was visiting friends across the Canadian border at the time the ban was signed, though he eventually made it across the border with help from his lawyer. [https://www.clearinghouse.net/chDocs/public/IM-MI-0004-0016.pdf
] In another case, a U.S. resident husband and wife of Yemeni origin were afraid to leave the U.S. to retrieve their three year old daughter, who's mother was forced to leave her in Djibouti due to the ban:


https://www.apnews.com/93ce3efb4ee3409ca646adda0c0f96aa
	In the United States, relatives of the stranded Yemenis are anguished.

	Esam Molhi and his wife, both green card holders from Yemen, now fear leaving for Djibouti to reunite with their 3-year-old daughter because Trump’s order might keep them from returning home.

	The girl was born in Yemen, and the U.S. Embassy there refused to let her fly with her mother to join Molhi in the U.S., Goldberg said. The family has been pursuing a U.S. visa for the girl since then.

	The child is staying in a rented room in Djibouti with her Yemeni grandfather, Molhi told the AP from his home in San Francisco, where he works as an Uber driver. He has not yet seen her in person, and his wife has not seen her since she was a month and a half old.

	“This is unfair,” Molhi said of Trump’s order. “I want him to feel as I feel, you know?”


Courts would find that uncertainty about how the executive order would affect returning U.S. residents was enough reason to sue, and the effect of this uncertainty on the lives and careers of residents who might wish to travel outside the United States was sufficient standing. Tawfeeq v. DHS was brought on behalf of a U.S. journalist and lawful permanent resident who was unsure whether he would be able to continue his job, which required him to travel overseas. 

argued administration's guidance to CBP and airlines unknown, and Tawfeeq's reentry to the U.S. was subject entirely to their discretion without a process for him to appeal. 

The fears of residents inside the U.S. affected by the executive order were not unfounded: while many made it back, some lawful permanent residents outside the U.S. at the time the order was signed were stranded by the travel ban:


http://www.france24.com/en/20170129-trump-muslim-ban-immigration-lawyer-usa
	“There’s a lot of uncertainty,” Yegani said. “A husband called me and said, ‘My wife is in Iran, we have a 2-year-old son and I have to go back to work. What do I do if she can’t come back?’”




http://www.fox2detroit.com/news/local-news/detroit-judge-halts-part-of-immigration-ban
	Samir Almasmari is a lawful resident of the U.S. who had been traveling back from Yemen on Sunday, but was denied boarding his flight in Egypt and returned back to Yemen.

	He will be able to return to the U.S. after this federal ruling, but the past week caused his family hurt and frustration.

	Fox 2 spoke to his father on the phone.

	"I was mad. His mother, she was crying," Muhammad Almasmari said.



https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-immigration-academics/iranian-academics-scared-and-stranded-by-trump-travel-ban-idUSKBN15D10R
	Another Iranian-born academic, Mohammad, said he was returning to his home in the United States after attending his father’s funeral in Tehran, when the ban came into effect.

	Turkish Airlines refused to allow him to board his connecting flight to New York from Istanbul, he said.

	Mohammad, 42, who refused to give his family name because he said he was concerned about administrative steps being taken against his U.S.-based family, said the ban was ”certainly going to make things harder for mostly well-educated Iranian immigrants.

	“I have a green card and have been living in the U.S. for years. My two little daughters are awaiting for me. What can my wife tell them?” he said. 

	“This is not what I dreamed about America.” 


http://www.middleeasteye.net/news/trump-s-muslim-ban-causes-confusion-turkey-s-main-international-air-hub-1677037302
	Another person denied boarding was New York-bound Ahmad Zahir, according to Hurriyet. 

	Zahir, an Iraqi national with permanent legal residency (Green card) in the US for the last two years, said he was not allowed to board the flight while his wife who was accompanying him was told she could travel. 

	Zahir, along with his wife, two children and a sibling, was trying to return to the US after a two-week trip to Iraq. He said his wife refused to travel after he was denied permission.


Doe v. Trump was filed on behalf of a class of similarly situated lawful U.S. residents who had been on brief trips outside the country but found themselves unable to return when the executive order was signed. The unnamed lead plaintiff was a Chicago homeowner and legal permanent resident who had been caring for his ailing mother in Iran at the time the executive order was signed. The plaintiff hoped to fly back home in time for the birth of his first grandchild, but was refused a ticket due to the executive order.

The unamed plaintiff and other lawful permanent residents abroad were denied their right to return to the United States with little warning and no opportunity to appeal, plainly violating their due process rights. Since the right for lawful U.S. permanent residents to return is explicitly stated in statues and cases like Rosenberg v. Flueti, the text of the executive order barred LPRs from returning, and some LPRs were indeed barred, courts would would see a clear-cut case for the order's unconstitutionality in its application to LPRs. By these facts, any stranded LPR petitioning for a TRO would be all but guranteed to prevail on likliness to win.

In the first few hours after the ban was signed, it was clear that the travel ban was in mortal legal danger. The chaos it brought was global, and the legal injury to travelers was grave--particularly for stranded LPRs--and heartbreaking, for cases like 12-year old Eman's. An untold number of other travelers were similarly situated.

Any of these could petition for a temporary restraining order, which would (by Trump's logic) give terrorists and subversives a window to rush in to the country. For a TRO, stranded LPRs would would be able to make a strong case for "likeliness to win." On top of this, any petitioner could point to Trump's public statements that the ban was intended to discriminate against Muslims, only adding to their likliness to win. Any of these people could petition for a TRO with the balance of harms and likeliness to win in their favor, and a TRO could be granted within hours without a hearing from administration lawyers.

The administration had a tough task ahead of them. According to Trump, the risk of terrorists having warning to enter the country was great enough to enact the ban without warning , and a single TRO would be enough to undermine that. To prevent a TRO, the administration would have to:


- throw cold water on the growing body of evidence that the executed order was intended to be a Muslim ban

- argue the EO justified for national security and so in the "public interest"

- in general, do anything to tip scales toward their likliness to win

- limit the chaos cased by the ban and be able to make a case in court that any harm caused by the ban were isolated incidents that wouldn't continue

- Explain their policy that LPRs were being allowed in and argue that those who weren't were isolated incidents due to mistakes

- Settle cases fast--release detainees, let stranded people back in


Things would be moving fast. Since TROs have a lower bar of evidence, even media reports would matter. Public relations and coordination with the justice department would be paramount.


...


Trump signed the executive order without showing it to the Justice Department, or even telling them about it:


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/30/politics/trump-travel-ban-q-and-a/
	This is the "extreme vetting" Trump promised during the campaign, but it still seems to have caught folks by surprise.

	Team Trump apparently never ran the order by officials at the Justice Department. 


http://www.cnn.com/TRANSCRIPTS/1705/19/acd.03.html
    COOPER: If the department of justice, their office of legal counsel was given a heads up so to speak about this and asked to review it, wouldn't they have given you head's up about it?

    YATES: Normally, they would. But my understanding is that they were asked not to tell us about it.

    COOPER: The department of justice's office of legal counsel was advised not to inform you specifically, the acting attorney general about this executive order.

    YATES: That's my understanding.

    COOPER: Do you know why you were not informed?

    YATES: I don't know. And I wasn't informed.

    COOPER: Is that normal procedure?

    YATES: No. First I heard of that.

    COOPER: You never heard it happening before.

    YATES: No.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	KLOBUCHAR: And during that meeting did they mention -- anyone mention that this refugee order was about to come out?

	YATES: No.

	KLOBUCHAR: Did the acting Attorney General of the United States?

	YATES: No and that was one thing that was of concern to us, is that not only was department leadership not consulted here and beyond department leadership, really the subject matter experts, the national security experts, not only was the department not consulted, we weren't even told about it. I learned about this from media reports.



Nor were officials in charge of implementing the ban given advance warning.


While the ban was being signed, Trump kept making public statements suggesting it was a Muslim ban:


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8Kf0ZesmuXo
	Remarks: Donald Trump - Washington, DC - January 27, 2017".

	I'm establishing new vetting measures to keep radical Islamic terrorists out of the United States of America.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/06/11/what-president-trump-has-said-about-muslims-travel-ban/102565166/
    ...Jan. 27, 2017

    Trump before signing the first travel ban during a ceremony at the Pentagon:

        "This is the ‘Protection of the Nation from Foreign Terrorist Entry into the United States.’ We all know what that means."



https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/825721153142521858
	Donald J. Trump‏
	Jan 29

	Christians in the Middle-East have been executed in large numbers. We cannot allow this horror to continue!



admin acted to screw over the ban

- Trump statement that christian refugees in middle east need to be prioritized. For some reason prioritizing "religious minorities" also in text of ban supposed to be about national security, Trump already knows Muslim ban illegal

- Guliani comes out on 29th saying we wanted to do a muslim ban but find a way to do it legally, ended up in court docs

- DHS legal analysis early on concludes it cannot legally apply to LPRs

- DHS cannot get "answers to basic questions" on LPR issue, says "we have 300 in air right now"

- Admin tells them to let in LPRs under excemption for some reason

- DHS official says "it will bar green card holders", statement ends up in court docs

- Other anonymous officials say green card holders will be admitted on "case by case basis," don't point out policy is to grant them exemption.

- WH doesn't weigh in on this until Feb 1 memo from McGahn, courts conclude that the EO initially barred returning LPRs and the admin changed their mind, deny lifting TRO citing that admin could just change their mind again

- courts end up saying admin "shifting positions about 5 times" on LPR issue

- In Louhghalam v. Trump, petitioner lawyers argue 




Even still, barring reentry for LPRs might not need to have been a death sentence for the travel ban. Records obtained by FOIA show that in the first few hours of its implementation, CBP developed a policy of allowing LPRs to enter the country under a waiver provision in the executive order. According to a DHS FAQ released on February 2nd, the CBP admitted 1,600 LPRs into the country through the EO's waiver provision. Records and media reports also show that CBP at least attempt to provide guidance to airlines that LPRs should be allowed to board flights to the U.S. The administration would therefore be able to argue that any LPRs barred from returning home were done so in error. This might not have saved the ban from being struck down as unconstitutional on the grounds of its application to LPRs (as Tawfeeq v. DHS pointed out, this policy left LPRs reentry at CBP's discretion with no opportunity to appeal), but it could be used to argue a TRO wasn't urgently needed.


https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-immigration-chaos/chaos-anger-as-trump-order-halts-some-muslim-immigrants-idUSKBN15C0LD

Jan 28

	...At the State Department, a senior official said lawyers were working to interpret the executive order, which allows entry to people affected by the order when it is in the “national interest.”

	However, a federal law enforcement official said: “It’s unclear at this point what the threshold of national interest is.” 



the text of the EO barred returning LPRs, and DHS right off the bat knew this is illegal.

Instead of changing the EO or making some kind of declaration, DHS and CBP decided to use the waiver exemption to let in LPRs.

But, for some reason, the admin did more inexplicable things:

they required a long secondary screening for returning LPRs

they made it so they would be held until granted an exemption

they did not communicate their policy of allowing LPRs to the public, or even that well to CBP staff

They had a policy of asking any first time immigrant to sign away admission or go to expediated removal proceedings, even initial LPRs